NodeJsProjects/SpellChecker/Dictionaries/lv_LV/lv_LV.dic
aizbikstīt/I+b(MJhBC1
aizdarīt/+dhgI[J(Bbc1M{C]
aizducināt/+b{(h}CcJI[MdBg1]
aizdīdīt/BI+[hgb(c1J]d{MC
aizgurkstēt/+h(CMBJ1I
aizkasīt/b+{MgIBJc(dh[1]C
aizkurināt/+bhBIC(JM1
aizlasīt/g1+MbJIch{d(B[]C
aizmetināt/+bg(dhBI}1Jc{C[]M
aizpeldināt/+(1gbhcCBI[d{M]J}
aizplēnēt/+1CbBIh(MJ
aizraidīt/+IMbJhB1(C
aizrādīt/+Ih(B1JbMC
aizskandināt/(+bhBICMJ1
aizslānīt/+(JIBhMb1C
aizspert/+I(h6dB[5]
aizstatīt/+bhgJd(I{1cBM][C
aizsēdēt/+bJIBcgh[dM{1]}
aiztīstīt/1+(bIBhJMC
aizvilināt/+(bg[J]cBI{hdC}M1
aizčubināt/+BI1(hJ]d[}gb*&cMC{
aizņudzēt/h(MC+bIBJ1
aizšķirstīt/B+bI(J1ChM
apart/eI+h(B84
apdedzināt/+hIJ(bBM1C
apdēdēt/I+hJBCb(1M
apguldināt/h+(BdIg1c]J[}Cb{M
apkladzināt/hCI+bB(J1M
apkustēt/hC+(BbJI1M
apluncināt/dBIg(b{+h}1cJMC][
apmīdīt/BI&+h(b*J1MC
appluinīt/+Jb(MhI1BC
apraudināt/C+hMJb(BI1
apsildīt/h+(1gM*cBI&J]bd{C[
apslidināt/+[hcI(gbBd{}CMJ]1
apspīdēt/I+hBC&(Jb*M1
apsveicināt/+Ib{cM(Bh}J1gd[]C
aptipināt/b+1(BIhCMJ
apvedināt/+MBI(b1hCJ
apčubināt/+(bhJ*IB&C1M
apšaubīt/+IBhb(JM1C
apžadzināt/J+b(hIBC1M
atbolīt/+Bgb(cdI1hM{J[C]
atdipināt/h+I1(bBJCM
atdārdēt/+BIM(b1hCJ
atgulēt/+Mh1IBbJg]{d[
atkaustīt/BI+h(J[gbcd]{1MC
atknikšķināt/dB(cJ+bgI[1hC{M}]
atlaidināt/Bb+(hJI&*1MC
atmudžināt/CIM+(1hBbJ
atplikšķināt/+I(bJChB1M
atpīkstēt/+Jbh(ICB1M
atrukšķēt/+hgbIdB1(c]J{}MC[
atskatīt/b+1BIJ]g([hc{MdC
atspridzināt/BdhJ]b{I(1+cg[}CM
atsvaidzināt/b+{}hc(BgI1d[CMJ]
attrallināt/Mg+BI1(h[bJc{]d}C
atvasināt/b+1(BIcghCJ[]dM{}
atvīstīt/cIh+(dMbg]J{B[C1
atčubināt/+hJb&*(IBC1M
atņerkstēt/hg+BbIcC(dM[1{}J]
atšķobīt/(+bgJdBI]hcM[1{C
badināt/+J]BI(Mhcdbg1{}[C
blīkšķināt/+cJh]Ib(Mg[1B}C{d
bēgt/M8+9I(BhJ4
darīt/+cgbI(Bd1hJ{]C[M
drebēt/+1IB(hCJbM
dziedāt/+&bhJ*IB1M
gaidīt/hI+bJM1B&*(C
grandēt/+bJhMIB(C1
ieadīt/BI1+h(JbMC
iebēgt/9+(BIhJ84M
iedipēt/IJ+BMhb(1C
iedziļināt/+Jhb(BCI1M
iegrūstīt/(g+bJ{dIcMhBC[]1
iekaisīt/+(c[hb]JgBdMI1{C
ieknaibīt/+1IBgb(dhM{cJ[]C
iekutēt/b+(MIhJ
ielocīt/hB+g1Ib{M(dJ[]
iemēģināt/M+IhCbB(J1
ieplandēt/b+hCBI(1JM
iepurpināt/+JIB(MbhC1
ieritēt/1IB+bhJ(CM
ieskanēt/+I1gBdb(hcJ}CM]{[
iesmīnēt/(hC+bMIJB1
iestatīt/+cb{gIhdMJ]B([C1
iesīkstēt/+dJH&(h*$c)bgI{CMB}][1
ietrīcēt/gb+Ih{d}cJ(M[C]B1
ievaukšķēt/(c+MgIhb{J[]BC1d}
iezibēt/b+I1JB(MhC
ieēdāt/h+}
iešmīkstēt/+bhM(IJB1C
iešņakstēt/b+hJ(ICMB1
izbadīt/chBJId+]M([1bg{C
izbārstīt/cB{b+hIJ](g[M1dC
izdimdēt/+h(IbCMJB1
izdēstīt/Ih+(B1JbMC
izguldīt/Ibg+h(cBCMJ]d{1[
izkaustīt/(+J]gcMCBhb1Id{[
izknaibīt/+(IB1Mhdcb{Jg][C
izkurkšķēt/h(1BI+JbCM
izlidināt/+IB(1bh}Jcd[gMC{]
izmanīt/+dBhJcb(CIg1{M[]
iznīcināt/h+b(BI1MJC
izplivināt/+BIJb(hCM1
izpurkšķināt/c+([hIb1g{CMJBd}]
izraugāt/+(hC
izrībēt/+M(bJIhCB1
izslacināt/J+IBdg1(ch{Mb}][C
izsolīt/b(+hcIBd[g]J{C1M
izstumdīt/(c+dBghb[I]JM{1C
izsūtīt/I1+(hJBbMC
iztrīcēt/+(CJbhIMB1
izvalstīt/d+BIM1(bchCJ[]{g
izvēdināt/h+(bIJBC1M
izčinkstēt/+hd{c(CIBgbM[J1}]
izļumēt/+(bBIChMJ1
izšķirt/[(hI+B65d]
jaunradīt/+hb1BI(JMC
kaustīt/I+cgBd1b{Mh(J]C[
klunkšķēt/h(b+CBMI1J
kratīt/b+]Jc1IB{[hd(gMC
kutēt/+IbBJC(hM1
laidināt/+h(cMbdJgIB]}{1C[
lupināt/+bMh(I1BCJ
minēt/+hb(BIgJcMd{[C1}]
musināt/J+bc(dgh[IBM{C]1}
neatkurcāt/Ch
nenošļūcāt/hC
nepārķērcāt/hC}
noasināt/Jb+h*C(&BI1M
nobraucīt/(M+bhIB1J
nocīnīt/+c1gMhIbJ{([Bd]C
nodirnēt/b+1IBJ(hCM
nodzirkstēt/B+Ib(MJCh1
nograbināt/(+IMbhc1gBC{dJ][}
nogurdināt/J+(IBhCbM1
nokarināt/+dcJhI(BbMCg1{[}]
noklikšķēt/+Ihc]J(gbBM1[C{}d
nokrakšķināt/Bd+hIb(]gJ[Mc{1C}
nokvēlināt/+hdBcM*&bI(1g}J{C[]
noliesināt/+hIMbgJd({B[c1}]C
nomirkšķināt/hM{+BdCc(1gIbJ]}[
noniecināt/+I[(gbBc&h*CdMJ]}{1
noplicināt/b(+IhBCMJ1
nopukstēt/(+hb1IJCBM
norakstīt/+h[I{b(]JcBdMgC1
norādīt/+chBdIbg({J]1MC[
noskanēt/+(Ibh1BCJM
noslānīt/+I(bBhJMC1
nosolīt/+h{bJgd(BIc[M1]C
nostaipīt/+bMI{cghJ(B1d[]C
nosusēt/b+(JhIBC1M
notarkšķināt/{+dB(J]cIg1bhC}M[
notrulināt/+*IBgcdbJ]{(hMC&[1}
notīstīt/cIh+b(dg]J[{MBC1
novilcināt/+bIJhB(C1M
nozibēt/(+IhbB1MJC
nočinkstēt/d{(Cc+hIBgM[bJ1}]
noķerstīt/J+hb(IgBcMd{1[]C
nošausmināt/b+IhJB(1MC
nošķīdināt/+h(bJMICB1
nožvīkstēt/+bhIBJ(MC1
pabakstīt/cb+(JBI1hgMC{[d]
pabubināt/+hbdcg(1IJMCB{}][
padancināt/+cb(gJh1BId[M{}]C
padrebēt/+(bIBJChM1
padziļināt/IB(1+&*bhJMC
pagodināt/+BIb(&M*hJC1
pagurdināt/+[(gc{bhdIBJ]}1MC
pakarināt/+dBJbcghI1({[]CM}
paklunkšķināt/+(BIbhMCJ1
pakrekšķināt/hd+cBMIb[g(1C{}J]
pakāpināt/hbI+M(1BJC
palecināt/J+bhMIC(B1
palūrēt/*+Bd[(hb&cJI{g1CM]}
pamurdēt/(+bJIhBC1M
papeldēt/+[gb(BICchJ]d}M{1
paplunkšķināt/I+(bhBMJC1
papēkšķēt/+hbM(JIC1B
paretināt/(+hbCBJI1M
pasaldināt/+bg{h}Cc(IBMJ]1d[
paslaistīt/+hbgcIMdJCB(]{[1
pasmīdināt/+J[{bhICc}MdB(g1]
paspārdīt/+(1IBhcbg[MdC{J]
pastāvēt/+hI}b1gcB(J]d[M{C
pasāpēt/BJ+(hb1ICM
patikšķēt/(+IBhbJM1C
patupēt/h+b(IC1BJM
pavalbīt/h+gBd(bICc]J1M[{
pavājināt/+hbJI*(B&CM1
pazuzēt/+(hJIBbC1M
pačivināt/+(h1dIB}bcgJC]{[M
paķert/(+IB6h5
pašausmināt/+(1IbhMBJC
pašķobīt/(+ghBIbJdcM1[{]C
peldināt/+hIbJM(1BC
piecept/+}hIT8Je[](MdB4
piedziedāt/hI+JBb1M
pieklabināt/[+h(cdBJIb]{1gMC}
piekārstīt/h+Jb(cIBgd[MC1{]
pieminēt/I+b(hBJMC1
pieplacināt/+JgBbIc{dh([C}M1]
piepļerkšķēt/+CbIBJhM1
pierībināt/+(IbhCBJM1
pieslaucīt/(+Bdb{J]gIMh1[
piestiprināt/B+(Jh&*bIC1M
pietarkšķēt/+JIh(bCB1M
pievirzīt/+hbJICB(M1
pieņirbināt/bB+hIJ(MC1
pilēt/bBIJ+(MhC1
plunkšķēt/h(+bBI1MJC
purkšķināt/J(]+Mgd[BhcI1bC}{
pārbakstīt/b+(I1hJBMC
pārdalīt/(I+h[bcJ]gMBd{1C
pārdzesināt/+hbcIdgMJ{(B}C1[]
pārglāstīt/+(IB1Cbc{hdgMJ[]
pārkaitēt/+J)Mhb(CB$IH1
pārknaibīt/+(I]JdBMbh{cg1[C
pārkārstīt/(+hbgcI[{B]JdM1C
pārlāpīt/+gIhMBcdb{(J[]C1
pārpeldēt/+g(hb1Ic{CJBdM}[]
pārputēt/+bh1IB(JCM
pārrēķināt/+J(hM1BIbC
pārskūpstīt/(d+bc]JghMIB[C1{
pārspaidīt/+BdcJb(1Igh[M{C]
pārstumdīt/+IdJ[b{(1ghcBMC]
pārsēdināt/+g([dIBb1{hJMc}C]
pārturēt/+JbIBhM(C1
pārvirzīt/b+[IMhdcJBg({1C]
pārčukstēt/C+(bJhMIB1
pāršvīkstēt/(h+ICJbMB1
pļerkšķēt/+MhIBbC1J
reizināt/+hbJ(IBMC1
rīdīt/+BdgbI(hc{J]M1C[
sablisināt/+IB1(MhJbC
sacerēt/+(IBhbgH[cC$dJ}]M1{
sadrupināt/hJc+(1IBgb{d[M]C}
sagaidīt/+bJI(1gdCBMh]c[{
saguldīt/+([bhcJICBdM{1g]
sakaitēt/)+(I$JBhHb1CM
saklukstēt/h{b}+dcgIB(MC[1]J
sakraukšķināt/c+(b{dgJ]IhB[1CM}
sakārdināt/+IhCb(BJM1
salecināt/J+bhBI(MC1
sametināt/+b{Jhc(1IBMd[g]C}
samēģināt/M+hbCIB(J1
sapildīt/+hI(c[bBd{J]gM1C
saprecināt/+Ich{b]J(MBdg[1C}
saraidīt/+[dhIbJ1gB(Mc{]C
sarukšķēt/dh+b[Cc}{I(MJ]gB1
saskaldīt/+gbBdhI[cJ(M1C]{
saslaucīt/h+Ib[J]({dg1BM
sasodīt/c+h[b(IBdgJ]1M{C
sastiprināt/+*Ihdg&bBMJ({c1C[]}
sasālīt/+cI1B(hb{g]Jd[MC
satraipīt/(+hbJcgIBd1C[M{]
satvarstīt/J]+hcg[I(1Bbd{MC
savidžināt/+B(bMIJh1C
saziedēt/b+h(H$MIB1CJ
sačākstēt/+bghJcd{M}]BI[1C
saņudzēt/+I(MhBb1JC
sašķirt/(hI+B65
sažņaugāt/(+hC
skrubināt/d+bCcJ([IBgh{]1M}
slīcināt/+Ihdb[c(1gJ]CBM}{
spilgtināt/+hIJB(*bC&M1
staipīt/+{Jh(bcMIgBC[d]1
stīvināt/+IcbMhJ(dC[B}g{]1
sārtināt/b+hcdJ(B{I[Mg1C}]
tikšķēt/C+hMI(bBJ1
trīcināt/hd[I+c(bg1JBC]M}{
ucināt/g+Ihb(*&[JCMc}{d1B]
uzblisināt/+Ihb(JC1BM
uzdarināt/+MChBI(1bJ
uzdzirdēt/+bB(hJM1C
uzgumzīt/(J+bBIhC1M
uzklausīt/Ic+(hbgBJd[{C]1M
uzkratīt/hb{+(dcIM1gBC[J]
uzkārpīt/Ihc+b(1gd]J{BC[M
uzmaisīt/+JdBgbh[I(cM{1C]
uzostīt/+bMg{(IhB1c[]JdC
uzplēnēt/+bBhI(CM1J
uzradīt/+JbIh(M
uzrībēt/+b(JIBCMh1
uzslapināt/J+hI(1BMbC
uzspert/Bd6+Ih5[(]
uzstiprināt/h+I(BMJ&*Cb1
uzsēdināt/hb+(MIJCB1
uztrinkšķināt/+hCBI1(bMJ
uzvarēt/IB+bJ1h(MC
uzzibēt/b+1(hIJMCB
uzčīkstināt/+JhbCMI(B1
uzņurdēt/I+BC(bhM1J
uzšķirt/+I6h[(B5d]
vaidēt/b(+hMICJB1
vidžināt/J+BM(bhIC1
vēdināt/(+*hb{dBcI1&gJ}C[]M
zvanīt/+Jb(BdgIhMc[1{]C
čivināt/BhI(JbM+C1
ķept/Ihe+MJB(84
šausmināt/J]b{hCIBd+(gM1c[}
šķindēt/+BI(Jh1bCM
ūjināt/b+(cBdhI{1JM[}gC]
